Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.550

Extracurricular activities—Calculation of opportunity gaps.

(1) A school district must calculate the opportunity gap in student possession of an associated student body card by subtracting the percentage of high school students who are low income and who possess an associated student body card from the percentage of high school students who are not low income and who possess an associated student body card.

(2)(a) A school district must calculate the opportunity gap in athletic program participation by subtracting the percentage of high school students who are low income and who participated in an athletic program from the percentage of high school students who are not low income and who participated in an athletic program.

(b) Although the calculation described in (a) of this subsection (2) is not required to use data on student participation in school clubs, high schools may include it at their discretion.

(3) School districts may elect to exclude the number of students who are low income and who are participating in the running start program, as defined in RCW 28A.600.300, when calculating opportunity gaps under this section.

[ 2020 c 13 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: See note following RCW 28A.320.580.